New York, session 2025-2026, S9612.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 3 and 4 of section 6305 of the education law, 2 subdivision 3 as amended by chapter 542 of the laws of 2022 and subdivi- 3 sion 4 as amended by section 2 of part V of chapter 57 of the laws of 4 2013, are amended and a new subdivision 4-a is added to read as follows: 5 3. The chief fiscal officer of each county, as defined in section 2.00 6 of the local finance law, shall, upon application and submission to such 7 chief fiscal officer of satisfactory evidence in-person or electron- 8 ically, issue to any person desiring to enroll in a community college as 9 a non-resident student, a certificate of residence form showing that 10 said person is a resident of said county. No such chief fiscal officer 11 shall require a person desiring to enroll in a community college as a 12 non-resident student to disclose or furnish his or her social security 13 number. If the chief fiscal officer of a county refuses to issue such a 14 certificate on the ground that the person applying therefor is not a 15 resident of such county, or that such person is not subject to rules or 16 regulations promulgated under subdivision four-a of this section, the 17 person applying may appeal, in writing, electronically or by mail, to 18 the chancellor of the state university. The chancellor of the state 19 university, or such officers or employees thereof as shall be designated 20 by the chancellor in a manner authorized by the state university trus- 21 tees, shall make a determination after a hearing, upon ten days' notice 22 to such chief fiscal officer of the county, and such determination shall 23 be final and binding on the county. Such person shall, upon registration 24 for each college year, file with the college such a certificate of resi- 25 dence form issued not earlier than two months prior thereto, and such 26 certificate of residence form shall be valid for a period of one year 27 from the date of issuance. The state university trustees shall be EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15184-01-6 S. 9612 2 1 authorized to promulgate regulations to effectuate the provisions of 2 this subdivision. 3 4. If, pursuant to subdivision two of this section, a community 4 college elects to charge to and collect an allocable portion of the 5 operating costs and a further sum on account of capital costs of such 6 college from each county which has issued a certificate form or certif- 7 icates of residence forms pursuant to subdivision three of this section, 8 on the basis of which non-resident students are attending such community 9 college, the president of such community college shall, within forty- 10 five days after the commencement of each college term or program, or as 11 otherwise provided by rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to 12 subdivision four-a of this section, submit to the chief fiscal officer 13 of each county a list of non-resident students attending such college on 14 the basis of such certificates of residence form and a voucher for the 15 amount payable by each county for these students. Such list and voucher 16 shall be determined on the basis of non-resident students enrolled in 17 the program as of the end (or last day) of the third week of the 18 commencement for a program scheduled for one semester, the end of the 19 second for a program scheduled for an academic quarter and the end of 20 the first week for any program scheduled to be completed in thirty days 21 or less. The chancellor of the state university, or such officers or 22 employees thereof as shall be designated by the chancellor in the manner 23 authorized by the state university trustees, shall notify the chief 24 fiscal officers of each county of the approved annual operating and 25 capital charge-back rate for each community college. The amount billed 26 to the chief fiscal officer of each county by the president of such 27 community college as a charge for the allocable portion of the operating 28 costs and a further sum on account of capital costs of such college for 29 non-resident students shall be paid to the chief fiscal officer of such 30 college by the billed county no later than sixty days after the county 31 receives said billing. 32 4-a. Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule, or regulation to the 33 contrary, the state university trustees are authorized and directed to 34 promulgate rules or regulations setting forth: (a) a schedule of late 35 fees and exceptions thereof for a student submitting a certificate of 36 residence form after the deadline otherwise prescribed by subdivision 37 four of this section for such submission, but within the relevant semes- 38 ter or term; and (b) a reconciliation process for valid forms received 39 after the list of non-resident students was sent to a county pursuant to 40 subdivision four of this section. 41 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.